Missouri, session 2026, SB1544.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 9, 10, 227, and 620, RSMo, are amended
by adding thereto thirty-eight new sections, to be known as
sections 9.025, 9.358, 9.406, 9.413, 9.418, 9.501, 9.502,
9.504, 9.509, 9.510, 9.516, 10.281, 10.282, 10.283, 10.284,
10.287, 10.288, 10.289, 10.292, 227.868, 227.895, 227.898,
227.900, 227.901, 227.902, 227.903, 227.904, 227.905, 227.906,
227.907, 227.908, 227.909, 227.910, 227.911, 227.912, 227.913,
227.914, and 620.430, to read as follows:
9.025. The month of January is hereby designated as
"Blood Donor Awareness Month". It is recommended to the
people of this state that the month be appropriately
observed through activities that increase awareness of the
importance of blood donation. The state deems blood and
blood products to be a critical resource and a vital public
health asset that must be readily available at all times.
9.358. April twenty-second each year is hereby
designated as "Missouri Black Bear Awareness Day". Citizens
of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate

HCS SB 1544 2
events and activities to provide education about efforts to
conserve Missouri's black bear population.
9.406. April twenty-seventh each year is hereby
designated as "Ulysses S. Grant Day" in Missouri. The
citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate the life of
the Civil War general and eighteenth president of the United
States, who made his home in St. Louis, Missouri, in the
years following his graduation from West Point and before
the Civil War.
9.413. November twenty-fourth each year is hereby
designated as "Frankie Muse Freeman Day" in Missouri. The
citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate Frankie Muse
Freeman, a St. Louis attorney who was a champion for civil
rights, won a landmark case that ended legal racial
discrimination in St. Louis public housing, and was the
first black woman appointed to the United States Commission
on Civil Rights by president Lyndon B. Johnson.
9.418. The last full week of April each year shall be
known as "Infertility Awareness Week" in Missouri. It is
estimated that approximately one in eight couples in the
United States experience infertility, impacting people
across all racial, ethnic, socioeconomic, and cultural
backgrounds. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities to raise
awareness about infertility.
9.501. The first full week in September each year is
hereby designated as "June's Week" and "Rare Pediatric
Disease Week" in Missouri in honor of June, a young
Missourian undergoing treatment for an atypical teratoid
rhabdoid tumor, subtype B (ATRT-B). The citizens of this

HCS SB 1544 3
state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
and activities to raise public awareness of rare pediatric
diseases, encourage early recognition of symptoms, and honor
Missouri children and families affected by rare pediatric
diseases.
9.502. March twenty-sixth of each year is hereby
designated as "Pediatric Acute-Onset Neuropsychiatric
Syndrome (PANS)/Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric
Disorder Associated with Streptococcus (PANDAS) Awareness
Day". The citizens of this state are encouraged to
participate in appropriate events and activities to raise
PANS/PANDAS awareness.
9.504. April fifth each year is hereby designated as
"Racquetball Day" in Missouri, in honor of Kirkwood
Racquetball, USA Racquetball's five-time consecutive high
school national champions. The citizens of this state are
encouraged to participate in appropriate events and
activities to learn more about the sport of racquetball and
celebrate Missouri's racquetball accomplishments.
9.509. April thirtieth each year is hereby designated
as "William Lacy Clay Sr. Day" in Missouri. The citizens of
this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to celebrate the life and legacy of
William Lacy Clay Sr., who represented Missouri's first
district in Congress from 1969 to 2001 and was one of the
founding members of the Congressional Black Caucus.
9.510. May tenth each year is hereby designated as
"Missouri River Runner Day" in Missouri. The citizens of
this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
events and activities to recognize the role of passenger
rail in connecting Missouri communities, supporting economic

HCS SB 1544 4
development, and promoting safe and reliable transportation
across the state.
9.516. June twenty-eighth each year is hereby
designated as "Eliot and Muriel Battle Day" in Missouri.
The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
appropriate events and activities to celebrate the lives of
Eliot Battle, the first Black faculty member at Hickman High
School in Columbia, and Muriel Battle, the first Black
principal in the Columbia Public School District. The
couple worked as a team to ease racial tensions during the
1960s and have been recognized with schools in Columbia
named in their honor: Eliot Battle Elementary School and
Muriel Williams Battle High School.
10.281. The smooth chanterelle, scientifically known
as Cantharellus lateritius, is selected for and shall be
known as the official mushroom for the state of Missouri.
10.282. The city of Dexter is selected for and shall
be known as the official "Rib City" for the state of
Missouri.
10.283. Missouri Military Academy in the city of
Mexico is selected for and shall be known as the official
military academy of the state of Missouri.
10.284. The Missouri Cherry Blossom Festival in the
city of Marshfield is selected for and shall be known as the
official state cherry blossom festival for the state of
Missouri.
10.287. The city of Kansas City is selected for and
shall be known as the official "Barbecue Capital" of the
state of Missouri.
10.288. The city of Belle is selected for and shall be
known as the official "Cowbell Capital" of the state of
Missouri.

HCS SB 1544 5
10.289. The city of Bland is selected for and shall be
officially known as "The Silver City of the Rock Island
Trail" for the state of Missouri.
10.292. If the Kansas City Chiefs relocate outside of
this state, the St. Louis Battlehawks shall be the official
professional football team of the state of Missouri.
227.868. The portion of State Highway E from State
Highway 79 continuing east to Riverview Drive in Ralls
County shall be designated the "James Thompson Highway".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs
to be paid by private donations.
227.895. The portion of State Highway D from State
Highway C continuing north to State Highway Y in St.
Francois County shall be designated as the "Carl G Koester
Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain signs designating such highway, with the
costs to be paid by private donations.
227.898. The portion of State Highway WW from State
Highway 13 continuing to State Highway H in Greene County
shall be designated the "Gary D McCormack Nemo Macto Unus
Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by the department of
transportation.
227.900. The bridge on CST Dougherty Ferry Road
crossing over Interstate 270 in St. Louis County shall be
designated the "Army SSG Salvatore Palazzolo Memorial
Bridge". The department of transportation shall erect and
maintain appropriate signs designating such bridge, with the
costs to be paid by the department of transportation.

HCS SB 1544 6
227.901. The portion of U.S. Highway 24 from Davis
Road continuing east to Ferguson Spring Road in Jackson
County shall be designated the "WWII Robert Earl Sauls
Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.
227.902. The portion of State Highway E from CRD 101
continuing east to CRD 361 in Johnson County shall be
designated the "Captain Vernon Collett Memorial Highway".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain
appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs
to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.903. The bridge on State Highway CC crossing over
Interstate 44 in Webster County shall be designated the "Dr
Tommy Macdonnell Memorial Bridge". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge. Notwithstanding provisions of
section 227.296, the costs shall be paid by the department
of transportation in recognition of the honoree's Silver
Star Award.
227.904. The portion of State Highway 13 from
Interstate 35 continuing north to U.S. Highway 136/69 in
Harrison County shall be designated the "Dr Scott Hall
Memorial Highway". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.
227.905. The bridge on Business 63 crossing over U.S.
Highway 60 in Howell County shall be designated the "Jerrad
Bennett Memorial Bridge". The department of transportation
shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
bridge, with the costs to be paid by private donations.

HCS SB 1544 7
227.906. The portion of State Highway 9 from Horizons
Parkway continuing north to Park College Entrance Drive in
Platte County shall be designated as "Firefighter Paramedic
Graham J Hoffman Memorial Highway". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the
department of transportation.
227.907. The bridge on State Highway 139 crossing over
Barber Creek in Putnam County shall be designated the "PVT
William W Smith Memorial Bridge". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the
department of transportation.
227.908. The bridge on State Highway 139 crossing over
Hooton/Newtown Creek in Sullivan County shall be designated
the "CPL Vernon D Jobe Memorial Bridge". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the
department of transportation.
227.909. The bridge on State Highway EE crossing over
Medicine Creek in Sullivan County shall be designated the
"PVT Charles A Paxton Memorial Bridge". The department of
transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the
department of transportation.
227.910. The portion of State Highway D from CST
Quendo Avenue continuing east to CST Sutter Avenue in St.
Louis County shall be designated the "Mayor Mary Louise
Carter Highway". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.

HCS SB 1544 8
227.911. The portion of U.S. Highway 61 from CRD R7
School Road continuing north to CRD Plattin Road in
Jefferson County shall be designated the "Army PFC Gary
Prather Memorial Highway". The department of transportation
shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by the department of
transportation.
227.912. The portion of U.S. Highway 63 from the
southern access at CST East Street/State Highway 17
continuing north to CST Main Street in Texas County shall be
designated the "Emmett Kelly Sr Memorial Highway". The
department of transportation shall erect and maintain
appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs
to be paid by private donations.
227.913. The portion of State Highway 79 from State
Highway D continuing north to CRD 118 in Pike County shall
be designated as the "Police Chief Richard A Hughes Memorial
Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and
maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with
the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.914. The portion of State Highway A from CST Old
Highway 21 continuing east to U.S. Highway 61/U.S. Highway
67 in Jefferson County shall be designated as "Fallen
Veterans POW/MIA Highway". The department of transportation
shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such
highway, with the costs to be paid by the department of
transportation.
620.430. 1. There is hereby established the
designation of "Missouri Rock Island Trail Community" for
municipalities located along the Rock Island Trail corridor
that promote outdoor recreation, heritage tourism, and
economic development within this state.

HCS SB 1544 9
2. The following municipalities are hereby designated
as Missouri Rock Island Trail Communities:
(1) The City of Bland; and
(2) The City of Belle.
3. Additional municipalities located along the Rock
Island Trail corridor may be designated as Missouri Rock
Island Trail communities by act of the general assembly.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
require the expenditure of state funds.
✓